New York, session 2025-2026, S3667.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Career and technical education pathway to a high school diplo- 4 ma. 1. a. A career and technical education (hereinafter referred to in 5 this section as CTE) pathway to a high school diploma is hereby estab- 6 lished. A CTE pathway to a diploma shall: 7 (i) result in a regents or local diploma; 8 (ii) differ from the traditional requirements to a regents or local 9 diploma with respect to required assessments; 10 (iii) be made available to all students, including, but not limited to 11 students with disabilities. 12 b. A CTE pathway to a diploma shall be based on curriculum and train- 13 ing designed to provide students with career, trade and technical skills 14 and shall demonstrate that the student is ready for a career or trade as 15 determined by regulations of the commissioner. A CTE pathway to a diplo- 16 ma shall include, but not be limited to: 17 (i) completion of a CTE sequence provided and administered by a busi- 18 ness practicing a particular trade or career, by a board of cooperative 19 educational services or any secondary education program approved by the 20 commissioner or by an institution of higher education; 21 (ii) completion of work-based learning experiences as provided by the 22 approved program; and 23 (iii) completion of a work-skills employability profile. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04997-01-5 S. 3667 2 1 c. For purposes of this section, a career and technical education 2 shall include, but not be limited to, courses of study in the following 3 career fields: agriculture education, business and marketing education, 4 family and consumer sciences education, health occupations education, 5 technical education, technology education, and trade and industrial 6 education. 7 2. The regents, in consultation with trade and professional organiza- 8 tions, shall promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to estab- 9 lish the curriculum, assessments and any other criteria that students 10 must achieve to earn a regents or local diploma via a CTE pathway. 11 3. Students who entered high school in the two thousand twenty-five-- 12 two thousand twenty-six school year and thereafter shall be eligible to 13 earn a diploma via a CTE pathway. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. Effective immediately, 15 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 16 sary for the timely implementation of this act on its effective date are 17 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.